Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1833.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 241.5 of Title 56, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Department of Human Services, subject to receipt of
federal approval as described in subsection B of this section:
1. Shall prohibit the use of Supplemental Nutrition Assistance
Program (SNAP) benefits for the purchase of candy and soft drinks;
and
2. May exclude any other foods the Director of Human Services
deems a nonnutritive food item.
B. The Department shall submit a request for a federal waiver
to the United States Department of Agriculture Food and Nutrition
Service to seek authorization to implement the provisions of

paragraph 1 of subsection A of this section and may seek
authorization, either through the initial waiver request or through
one or more subsequent waiver requests, to implement the provisions
of paragraph 2 of subsection A of this section. Any such waiver
request shall include:
1. A justification citing:
a. public health concerns,
b. SNAP’s statutory intent, and
c. cost savings to taxpayers;
2. An implementation plan ensuring that existing point-of-sale
systems used by retailers in this state have the ability to properly
enforce the restriction;
3. A strategy for education and outreach informing SNAP
recipients of alternative healthy food options; and
4. A reporting mechanism to track the impact of the waiver,
including spending patterns and health outcomes.
C. If the waiver is approved, the Department shall implement
the restrictions within six (6) months of receiving federal
authorization.
D. The Department shall electronically submit an annual report
to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House
of Representatives, and the Governor that includes:
1. The status of the waiver request;
2. Data on SNAP spending patterns in this state; and
3. Any identified challenges or recommendations for further
policy action.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1833 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 23rd day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 29th day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1833 Page 3